Florida, session 2026, HB1403.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. This act may be cited as the "Deferred
Compensation Automatic Enrollment Act."
Section 2. Subsection (3) of section 112.215, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
112.215 Government employees; deferred compensation
program.—
(3)(a) In accordance with a plan of deferred compensation
which has been approved as herein provided, the state or any
state agency, county, municipality, other political subdivision,
or constitutional county officer may, by contract or a
collective bargaining agreement, agree with any employee to
defer all or any portion of that employee's otherwise payable
compensation and, pursuant to the terms of such approved plan
and in such proportions as may be designated or directed under
that plan, place such deferred compensation in savings accounts
or use the same to purchase fixed or variable life insurance or
annuity contracts, securities, evidence of indebtedness, or such
other investment products as may have been approved for the
purposes of carrying out the objectives of such plan. Such
insurance, annuity, savings, or investment products must shall
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1403-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1403 2026
be underwritten and offered in compliance with the applicable
federal and state laws and regulations by persons who are duly
authorized by the applicable state and federal authorities.
(b) Such plan of deferred compensation may include an
automatic enrollment arrangement under which a government
employee's otherwise payable compensation is deducted and
contributed to the plan unless the government employee elects
not to contribute or elects to contribute a different rate or
amount. Such automatic enrollment arrangement must establish a
default contribution rate, may provide for the periodic
reenrollment of government employees eligible but not
participating in the plan, and may allow the periodic resetting
of contribution rates for government employees contributing at
rates lower than those established by the automatic enrollment
arrangement.
(c) An automatic enrollment arrangement must provide that
a government employee may, at any time, elect not to contribute
to the plan or may elect to contribute to the plan at a
different rate or amount than the default rate.
(d) If a deferred compensation plan includes an automatic
enrollment arrangement, the plan must provide for a default
investment into which contributions must be placed in the
absence of an election from the government employee.
(e) Any county, municipality, or other political
subdivision of the state may by ordinance, and any
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1403-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1403 2026
constitutional county officer under s. 1(d), Art. VIII of the
State Constitution may by contract agreement or other
documentation constituting approval, adopt an automatic
enrollment arrangement for its own deferred compensation
program. Notwithstanding subsection (4), the deferred
compensation plan of the state may adopt an automatic enrollment
arrangement only upon the approval of the Legislature and not
pursuant to the authority of the Chief Financial Officer.
Section 3. Subsection (1) of section 110.114, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
110.114 Employee wage deductions.—
(1) The state or any of its departments, bureaus,
commissions, and officers are authorized and permitted, with the
concurrence of the Department of Financial Services, to make
deductions from the salary or wage of any employee or employees
in such amount as shall be authorized and requested by such
employee or employees and for such purpose as shall be
authorized and requested by such employee or employees and shall
pay such sums so deducted as directed by such employee or
employees. Deduction of the salary or wage of an employee as
authorized by an automatic enrollment arrangement pursuant to s.
112.215(3)(c) must be treated as authorized and requested by
such employee for purposes of this subsection. The concurrence
of the Department of Financial Services may shall not be
100 required for the deduction of a certified bargaining agent's
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1403-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1403 2026
101 membership dues deductions pursuant to s. 447.303 or any
102 deductions authorized by a collective bargaining agreement.
103 Section 4. Subsection (1) of section 112.171, Florida
104 Statutes, is amended to read:
105 112.171 Employee wage deductions.—
106 (1) The counties, municipalities, and special districts of
107 the state and the departments, agencies, bureaus, commissions,
108 and officers thereof are authorized and permitted in their sole
109 discretion to make deductions from the salary or wage of any
110 employee or employees in such amount as shall be authorized and
111 requested by such employee or employees and for such purpose as
112 shall be authorized and requested by such employee or employees
113 and shall pay such sums so deducted as directed by such employee
114 or employees. Deduction of the salary or wage of an employee as
115 authorized by an automatic enrollment arrangement pursuant to s.
116 112.215(3)(c) must be treated as authorized and requested by
117 such employee for purposes of this subsection.
118 Section 5. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1403-00